New York, session 2025-2026, A900.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision f of section 27-2056.4 of the administrative 2 code of the city of New York, as added by local law number 1 of the city 3 of New York for the year 2004, is amended to read as follows: 4 f. The owner shall inform the occupant in writing of the results of an 5 investigation undertaken pursuant to this section and shall provide a 6 copy of any such report received or generated by an investigation. The 7 owner shall retain a copy of each investigation report, for ten years 8 from the date of such report and such report shall be made available to 9 the department on request and shall be transferred by the owner to the 10 owner's successor in title. The owner shall provide to an occupant of a 11 dwelling unit at the signing of a lease, including a lease renewal, if 12 any, or upon any agreement to lease, or at the commencement of occupancy 13 if there is no lease and to prospective lessees the most recent results 14 of an investigation undertaken pursuant to this section and any and all 15 abatement measures taken as required by this section where the presence 16 of lead-based paint or lead-contaminated dust was found. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 18 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02965-01-5